New York, session 2025-2026, S3733.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil practice law and rules is amended by adding a new 2 section 8023 to read as follows: 3 § 8023. Electronic citation fees. (a) As used in this section, "elec- 4 tronic citation" means the process of transmitting traffic, misdemeanor, 5 municipal ordinance, conservation, or other citations and law enforce- 6 ment data via electronic means to a county clerk. 7 (b) The clerks of the county in the state shall be entitled to collect 8 an electronic citation fee of five dollars. Such fee shall be paid by 9 the defendant in any traffic, misdemeanor, municipal ordinance, or 10 conservation citation issued upon a plea of guilty, judgment of guilty 11 or grant of supervision. This fee shall be in addition to all other fees 12 and charges and assessable as costs and shall not be subject to 13 disbursement. Sixty percent of the fee shall be deposited into the 14 "electronic citation fund" established by each county. Forty percent of 15 the fee shall be disbursed to the arresting agency to defray expenses 16 related to the establishment and maintenance of electronic citations. 17 Each county clerk shall be the custodian, ex officio, of the electronic 18 citation fund and shall use the fund to perform the duties required by 19 the office for establishing and maintaining electronic citations. The 20 county clerk shall not charge and collect an electronic citation fee if 21 the county has by ordinance elected not to be subject to this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07520-01-5